Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Subchapter 1. General

§ 4451.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Actual notice” means receipt of written notice hand-delivered or mailed to the last known address. A rebuttable presumption that the notice was received three days after mailing is created if the sending party proves that the notice was sent by first-class or certified U.S. mail.

“Building, housing, and health regulations” means any law, ordinance, or governmental regulation concerning health, safety, sanitation, or fitness for habitation or concerning the construction, maintenance, operation, occupancy, use, or appearance of any premises or dwelling unit.

“Dwelling unit” means a building or the part of a building that is used as a home, residence, or sleeping place by one or more persons who maintain a household.

“Landlord” means the owner, lessor, or where applicable, the sublessor of a residential dwelling unit or the building of which it is a part.

“Normal wear and tear” means the deterioration that occurs, based upon the reasonable use for which the rental unit is intended, without negligence, carelessness, accident, or abuse of the premises or equipment or chattels by the tenant or members of his or her household or their invitees or guests.

“Premises” means a dwelling unit, its appurtenances and the building, and the grounds, areas, and facilities held out for the use of tenants generally or whose use is promised to the tenant.

“Rent” means all consideration to be made to or for the benefit of the landlord under the rental agreement, not including security deposits.

“Rental agreement” means all agreements, written or oral, embodying terms and conditions concerning the use and occupancy of a dwelling unit and premises.

“Sublease” means a rental agreement, written or oral, embodying terms and conditions concerning the use and occupancy of a dwelling unit and premises between two tenants, a sublessor, and a sublessee.

“Tenant” means a person entitled under a rental agreement to occupy a residential dwelling unit to the exclusion of others.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2007, No. 176

(Adj. Sess.), § 44;

2015, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 4452.
Exclusions.

Unless created to avoid the application of this chapter, this chapter does not apply to any of the following:

occupancy at a public or private institution, operated for the purpose of providing medical, geriatric, educational, counseling, religious, or similar service;

occupancy under a contract of sale of a dwelling unit or the property of which it is a part, if the occupant is the purchaser or a person who succeeds to the interest of the purchaser;

occupancy by a member of a fraternal, social, or religious organization in the portion of a building operated for the benefit of the organization;

transient occupancy in a hotel, motel, or lodgings during the time the occupancy is subject to a tax levied under 32 V.S.A. chapter 225;

occupancy by the owner of a condominium unit or the holder of a proprietary lease in a cooperative;

rental of a mobile home lot governed by 10 V.S.A. chapter 153;

transient residence in a campground, which for the purposes of this chapter means any property used for seasonal or short-term vacation or recreational purposes on which are located cabins, tents, or lean-tos, or campsites designed for temporary set-up of portable or mobile camping, recreational, or travel dwelling units, including tents, campers, and recreational vehicles such as motor homes, travel trailers, truck campers, and van campers;

transient occupancy in a hotel, motel, or lodgings during the time the occupant is a recipient of General Assistance or Emergency Assistance temporary housing assistance, or occupancy in a hotel or motel funded by federal Emergency Rental Assistance administered by the Department for Children and Families through September 30, 2025, regardless of whether the occupancy is subject to a tax levied under 32 V.S.A. chapter 225;

occupancy of a dwelling unit without right or permission by a person who is not a tenant; or

transient occupancy by an occupant placed in a hotel, motel, or lodgings in connection with health care treatment or recovery, where the occupancy is paid for by a hospital as licensed in 18 V.S.A. chapter 43, an agency designated pursuant to

18 V.S.A. § 8907

, or a specialized service agency operating under an agreement entered into pursuant to

18 V.S.A. § 8912

, regardless of whether the occupant is subject to a tax levied under 32 V.S.A. chapter 225.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1987, No. 116

, § 1;

1987, No. 252

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2007, No. 196

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2015, No. 58

, § E.321.3;

2015, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2019, No. 177

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. October. 12, 2020;

2021, No. 83

(Adj. Sess.), § 54a, effective March 16, 2022.

§ 4453.
Obligations implied.

Obligations imposed on landlords and tenants under this chapter shall be implied in all rental agreements.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 4454.
Attempt to circumvent.

No rental agreement shall contain any provision that attempts to circumvent or circumvents obligations and remedies established by this chapter and any such provision shall be unenforceable and void.

HISTORY:

Added

1985, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.